Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.12 Health Care for Adults

40-8.12-1.
Purpose.

Pursuant to §

42-12.3-2

, it is the intent of the general assembly to create access to comprehensive health care for uninsured Rhode Islanders. The Rhode Island Medicaid program has become an important source of insurance coverage for low-income pregnant women, families with children, elders, and persons with disabilities who might not be able otherwise to obtain or afford health care. Under the U.S. Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (ACA) of 2010, all Americans will be required to have health insurance, with some exceptions, beginning in 2014. Federal funding is available with ACA implementation to help pay for health insurance for low-income adults, ages nineteen (19) to sixty-four (64), who do not qualify for Medicaid eligibility under Rhode Island general and public laws. It is the intent of the general assembly, therefore, to implement the Medicaid expansion for adults without dependent children authorized by the ACA, to extend health insurance coverage to these Rhode Islanders and further the goal established in §

42-12.3-2

in 1993.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 19, § 2.

40-8.12-2.
Eligibility.

Medicaid coverage for nonpregnant adults without children. There is hereby established, effective January 1, 2014, a category of Medicaid eligibility pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as amended by the U.S. Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (ACA) of 2010, 42 U.S.C. § 1396u-1, for adults ages nineteen (19) to sixty-four (64) who do not have dependent children and do not qualify for Medicaid under Rhode Island general laws applying to families with children and adults who are blind, aged, or living with a disability. The executive office of health and human services is directed to make any amendments to the Medicaid state plan and waiver authorities established under Title XIX necessary to implement this expansion in eligibility and ensure the maximum federal contribution for health insurance coverage provided pursuant to this chapter.

Income. The secretary of the executive office of health and human services is authorized and directed to amend the Medicaid Title XIX state plan and, as deemed necessary, any waiver authority to effectuate this expansion of coverage to any Rhode Islander who qualifies for Medicaid eligibility under this chapter with income at or below one hundred and thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty level, based on modified adjusted-gross income.

Delivery system. The executive office of health and human services is authorized and directed to apply for and obtain any waiver authorities necessary to provide persons eligible under this chapter with managed, coordinated healthcare coverage consistent with the principles set forth in chapter 12.4 of title 42, pertaining to a healthcare home.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 19, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 32.

40-8.12-3.
Premium assistance program.

The executive office of health and human services is directed to amend its rules and regulations to implement a premium assistance program for adults with dependent children, enrolled in the state’s health-benefits exchange, whose annual income and resources meet the guidelines established in §

40-8.4-4

in effect on December 1, 2013. The premium assistance will pay one-half of the cost of a commercial plan that a parent may incur after subtracting the cost-sharing requirement under §

40-8.4-4

as of December 31, 2013, and any applicable federal tax credits available. The office is also directed to amend the 1115 waiver demonstration extension and the medical assistance Title XIX state plan for this program if it is determined that it is eligible for funding pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.

The executive office of health and human services shall require any individual receiving benefits under a state-funded, healthcare assistance program to apply for any health insurance for which he or she is eligible, including health insurance available through the health benefits exchange. Nothing shall preclude the state from using funds appropriated for Affordable Care Act transition expenses to reduce the impact on an individual who has been transitioned from a state program to a health insurance plan available through the health benefits exchange. It shall not be deemed cost-effective for the state if it would result in a loss of benefits or an increase in the cost of healthcare services for the person above an amount deemed de minimus as determined by state regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 19, § 2.